Mississippi statutes. Title 35. War Veterans and Pensions
Chapter 5. Guardianship of Veterans

§ 35-5-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Veterans’ Guardianship Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 7352; 1942, § 7509; Laws, 1930, ch. 204.

§ 35-5-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

The term “person” includes a partnership, corporation or an association.

The term “bureau” means the United States Veterans’ Bureau or its successor.

The terms “estate” and “income” shall include only moneys received by the guardian from the bureau and all earnings, interest and profits derived therefrom.

The term “benefits” shall mean all moneys payable by the United States through the bureau.

The term “director” means the director of the United States Veterans’ Bureau or his successor.

The term “ward” means a beneficiary of the bureau.

The term “guardian” as used herein shall mean any person acting as a fiduciary for a ward.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 7335; 1942, § 7493; Laws, 1930, ch. 204.

§ 35-5-5.
Petition for appointment of guardian.

Whenever, pursuant to any laws of the United States or regulation of the bureau, the director requires, prior to payment of benefits, that a guardian be appointed for a ward, such appointment shall be made in the manner hereinafter provided.

A petition for the appointment of a guardian may be filed in any court of competent jurisdiction by or on behalf of any person who under existing law is entitled to priority of appointment. If there be no person so entitled or if the person so entitled shall neglect or refuse to file such a petition within thirty days after mailing of notice by the bureau to the last known address of such person indicating the necessity for the same, a petition for such appointment may be filed in any court of competent jurisdiction by or on behalf of any responsible person residing in this state.

The petition for appointment shall set forth the name, age, place of residence of the ward, the names and places of residence of the nearest relative, if known, and the fact that such ward is entitled to receive moneys payable by or through the bureau and shall set forth the amount of moneys then due and the amount of probable future payments.

The petition shall also set forth the name and address of the person or institution, if any, having actual custody of the ward.

In the case of a mentally incompetent ward the petition shall show that such ward has been rated incompetent on examination by the bureau in accordance with the laws and regulations governing the bureau.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, §§ 7336, 7338; 1942, §§ 7494, 7496; Laws, 1930, ch. 204.

§ 35-5-7.
Evidence of necessity for appointment of guardian of minor.

Where a petition is filed for the appointment of a guardian of a minor ward, a certificate of the director, or his representative, setting forth the age of such minor as shown by the records of the bureau and the fact that the appointment of a guardian is a condition precedent to the payment of any moneys due the minor by the bureau, shall be prima facie evidence of the necessity for such appointment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 7339; 1942, § 7497; Laws, 1930, ch. 204.

§ 35-5-9.
Evidence of necessity for appointment of guardian of mental incompetent.

Where a petition is filed for the appointment of a guardian of a mentally incompetent ward, a certificate of the director, or his representative, setting forth the fact that such person has been rated incompetent by the bureau on examination in accordance with the laws and regulations governing such bureau, and that the appointment of a guardian is a condition precedent to the payment of any moneys due such person by the bureau, shall be prima facie evidence of the necessity for such appointment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 7340; 1942, § 7498; Laws, 1930, ch. 204.

§ 35-5-11.
Notice of petition for appointment of guardian.

Upon the filing of a petition for the appointment of a guardian, under the provisions of this chapter, the court shall cause such notice to be given as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 7341; 1942, § 7499; Laws, 1930, ch. 204.

§ 35-5-13.
Appointment of guardian; bond; sureties.

Before making an appointment under the provisions of this chapter the court shall be satisfied that the guardian whose appointment is sought is a fit and proper person to be appointed. Upon the appointment being made the guardian shall execute and file a bond to be approved by the court in an amount not less than the sum then due and estimated to become payable during the ensuing year. The said bond shall be in the form and be conditioned as required of guardians appointed under the guardianship laws of this state. The court shall have the power from time to time to require the guardian to file an additional bond.

Where a bond is tendered by a guardian with personal sureties, such sureties shall file with the court a certificate under oath which shall describe the property owned, both real and personal, and that they are each worth the sum named in the bond as the penalty thereof over and above all their debts and liabilities and exclusive of property exempt from execution.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 7342; 1942, § 7500; Laws, 1930, ch. 204.

§ 35-5-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1973, ch. 332, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1973).

[Codes, 1930, § 7337; 1942, § 7495; Laws, 1930, ch. 204]

§ 35-5-17.
Filing of annual accounts and other proceedings by guardian.

Every guardian who shall receive on account of his ward any moneys from the bureau shall file with the court annually, in addition to such other accounts as may be required by the court, a full, true, and accurate account under oath of all moneys so received by him, of all disbursements thereof, and showing the balance thereon in his hands at the date of such account and how invested. All accounts and petitions shall be filed with the clerk in duplicate and a certified copy of each of such accounts or petitions filed with the court shall be immediately forwarded by the chancery clerk to the bureau having jurisdiction over the area in which such court is located. The clerk in the certificate shall certify that a copy of same is being mailed to the said bureau, and after same has been mailed, the clerk of the court shall enter upon the records where the case is pending a notation that a copy of said petition or account has been forwarded by mail to the said bureau. Said mailing and said certificate shall have been performed and notation made on the docket thirty days before said matter shall be taken up for hearing by the court unless said notice shall be waived by the bureau.

After hearing on all accounts or other matters it shall be the duty of the guardian to furnish certified copies of all orders entered to the state office of the bureau.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 7343; 1942, § 7501; Laws, 1930, ch. 204; Laws, 1935, ch. 43.

§ 35-5-19.
Filing of vouchers by financial institutions.

In any annual or final account or other proceedings under this chapter, whenever an accounting to the court is required, in the event that the account shall be presented by a bank or trust company which is subject to the supervision of the department of bank supervision of the State of Mississippi or of the comptroller of the currency of the United States, and such account, or the petition for the approval of same, shall contain a statement under oath by an officer of said bank or trust company showing that the vouchers covering the disbursements in the account presented are on file with the said bank or trust company, such bank or trust company shall not be required to file vouchers. The court, however, on its own motion, or on motion of the administrator of veterans affairs, or his duly authorized representative or attorney, may require that said vouchers be produced for examination and inspection.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7501.5; Laws, 1960, ch. 217, § 12.

§ 35-5-21.
Removal of guardian for failure to file account.

If any guardian shall fail to file any account of the moneys received by him from the bureau on account of his ward within thirty days after such account is required by either the court or the bureau, or shall fail to furnish the bureau a copy of his accounts as required by this chapter, such failure shall be grounds for removal.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 7344; 1942, § 7502; Laws, 1930, ch. 204.

§ 35-5-23.
Compensation of guardians.

In the final account the court or chancellor in vacation shall make an allowance to the guardian for his services not to exceed five percent (5%) on the value of the estate which shall be equitably prorated where the guardianship has been administered by two (2) or more guardians, except as hereinafter provided. In the event of extraordinary services rendered by such guardian the court may, upon petition and after hearing thereon, authorize additional compensation therefor payable from the estate of the ward. Notice of such petition and hearing shall be given the proper office of the bureau in the manner provided by Section 35-5-17. In annual or partial accounts the court or chancellor may allow a guardian a reasonable commission for his services based upon the amount of disbursements, or, in proper cases where the amount based on disbursements would be inadequate, on the amount received or invested, or the total value of the estate as in other cases of guardianship, but not to exceed the maximum hereinabove provided for, except that in any event the court or chancellor in vacation, in its discretion may allow a minimum commission of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per annum. The guardian may be allowed from the estate of his ward reasonable premiums paid by him to any corporate surety upon his bond. The guardian’s attorney may be allowed from the estate of the ward a reasonable attorney’s fee for legal services to the estate or to the ward, if the court be of the opinion that the services were proper and rendered in good faith, the amount of the fee to be in the discretion of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 7345; 1942, § 7503; Laws, 1930, ch. 204; Laws, 1936, ch. 245; Laws, 1966, ch. 320, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 1966).

§ 35-5-25.
Use of ward’s estate.

A guardian shall not apply any portion of the estate of his ward for the support and maintenance of any person other than his ward, except upon order of the court after a hearing, notice of which has been given the proper office of the bureau in the manner provided in Section 35-5-17.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 7347; 1942, § 7504; Laws, 1930, ch. 204.

§ 35-5-27.
Discharge of guardian.

When a minor for whom a guardian has been appointed under the provisions of this chapter or other laws of this state shall have attained his or her majority, and if incompetent shall be declared competent by the bureau and the court, and when any incompetent ward, not a minor, shall be declared competent by said bureau and the court, the guardian shall, upon making a satisfactory accounting, be discharged upon a petition filed for that purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 7350; 1942, § 7507; Laws, 1930, ch. 204.

§ 35-5-29.
Furnishing of free copies of public records.

Whenever a copy of any public record is required by the bureau to be used in determining the eligibility of any person to participate in the benefits made available by such bureau, the official charged with the custody of such public record shall without charge provide the applicant for such benefits or any person acting on his behalf or the representative of such bureau, with a certified copy of such record.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 7348; 1942, § 7505; Laws, 1930, ch. 204.

§ 35-5-31.
Commitment to Veterans Administration or other agency of the United States government.

Whenever, in any proceeding under the laws of this state for the commitment of a person alleged to be a person with mental illness, person with an intellectual disability, or otherwise of unsound mind, or otherwise in need of confinement in a hospital or other institution for his proper care, it is determined after the adjudication of the status of the person as may be required by law that commitment to a state psychiatric hospital or institution or other institution is necessary for safe-keeping or treatment, and it appears that the person is eligible for care or treatment by the Veterans Administration or other agency of the United States government, the court, upon receipt of a certificate from the Veterans Administration or such other agency showing that facilities are available and that the person is eligible for care or treatment in those facilities, may commit the person to the Veterans Administration or other agency. The person whose commitment is sought shall be personally served with notice of the pending commitment proceeding in the manner provided by the law of this state; and nothing in this section shall affect his right to appear and be heard in the proceedings. Upon commitment, the person, when admitted to any facility operated by the Veterans Administration or other agency within or without this state shall be subject to the rules and regulations of the Veterans Administration or other agency. The chief officer of any facility of the Veterans Administration or institution operated by any other agency of the United States to which the person is so committed shall, with respect to the person, be vested with the same powers as superintendents of state psychiatric hospitals or institutions within this state with respect to retention of custody, transfer, parole or discharge. Jurisdiction is retained in the committing or other appropriate court of this state at any time to inquire into the mental condition of the person so committed, and to determine the necessity for continuance of his restraint, and all commitments under this section are so conditioned.

The judgment or order of commitment by a court of competent jurisdiction of another state or of the District of Columbia, committing a person to the Veterans Administration or other agency of the United States government for care or treatment, shall have the same force and effect as to the committed person while in this state as in the jurisdiction in which is situated the court entering the judgment or making the order, and the courts of the committing state or of the District of Columbia shall be deemed to have retained jurisdiction of the person so committed for the purpose of inquiring into the mental condition of the person and of determining the necessity for continuance of his restraint, as is provided in subsection (1) of this section with respect to persons committed by the courts of this state. Consent is given to the application of the law of the committing state or District of Columbia in respect to the authority of the chief officer of any facility of the Veterans Administration or of any institution operated in this state by any other agency of the United States to retain custody, or transfer, parole or discharge the committed person.

Upon receipt of a certificate of the Veterans Administration or such other agency of the United States that facilities are available for the care or treatment of any person committed to a state psychiatric hospital or institution or for the care or treatment of persons similarly afflicted, and that the person is eligible for care or treatment, the superintendent of the state psychiatric hospital or institution may cause the transfer of the person to the Veterans Administration or other agency of the United States for care or treatment. Upon effecting any such transfer, the committing court or proper officer of the court shall be notified of the transfer by the transferring agency. No person shall be transferred to the Veterans Administration or other agency of the United States if he is confined because of conviction of any felony or misdemeanor or if he has been acquitted of the charge solely on the ground of insanity, unless before transfer, the court or other authority originally committing the person enters an order for the transfer after appropriate motion and hearing.

Any person transferred as provided in this section shall be deemed to be committed to the Veterans Administration or other agency of the United States under the original commitment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 7349; 1942, § 7506; Laws, 1930, ch. 204; Laws, 1944, ch. 176, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 442, § 13; Laws, 2010, ch. 476, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 1, 2010).

§ 35-5-33.
Construction of chapter.

This chapter shall be construed liberally to secure the beneficial intents and purposes thereof and shall apply only to beneficiaries of the bureau.

This chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, §§ 7351, 7353; 1942, §§ 7508, 7510; Laws, 1930, ch. 204.